District of Columbia statutes.
31-3418

Repealed

Examinations.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 19, 44 DCR 818
Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 12(c), 44 DCR 4819
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-252, § 2(g), 50 DCR 225
1981 Ed., § 35-4518.